Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3514
Person in interest, defined.

Person in interest shall mean the person who is the primary subject of a criminal justice record or any representative designated by such person, except that if the subject of the record is under legal disability, person in interest shall mean the person's parent or duly appointed legal representative.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 14.